windows/es.aff
SFX E Y 420
SFX E   0     lo          me
SFX E   0     los         me
SFX E   0     la          me
SFX E   0     las         me
SFX E   0     le          me
SFX E   0     les         me
SFX E   me    telo        me
SFX E   me    telos       me
SFX E   me    tela        me
SFX E   me    telas       me
SFX E   me    tele        me
SFX E   me    teles       me
SFX E   me    selo        me
SFX E   me    selos       me
SFX E   me    sela        me
SFX E   me    selas       me
SFX E   me    sele        me
SFX E   me    seles       me
SFX E   me    noslo       me
SFX E   me    noslos      me
SFX E   me    nosla       me
SFX E   me    noslas      me
SFX E   me    nosle       me
SFX E   me    nosles      me
SFX E   ame   emelo       [^cguz]ame
SFX E   ame   emelos      [^cguz]ame
SFX E   ame   emela       [^cguz]ame
SFX E   ame   emelas      [^cguz]ame
SFX E   ame   emele       [^cguz]ame
SFX E   ame   emeles      [^cguz]ame
SFX E   ame   eselo       [^cguz]ame
SFX E   ame   eselos      [^cguz]ame
SFX E   ame   esela       [^cguz]ame
SFX E   ame   eselas      [^cguz]ame
SFX E   ame   esele       [^cguz]ame
SFX E   ame   eseles      [^cguz]ame
SFX E   ame   enoslo      [^cguz]ame
SFX E   ame   enoslos     [^cguz]ame
SFX E   ame   enosla      [^cguz]ame
SFX E   ame   enoslas     [^cguz]ame
SFX E   ame   enosle      [^cguz]ame
SFX E   ame   enosles     [^cguz]ame
SFX E   ame   enmelo      [^cguz]ame
SFX E   ame   enmelos     [^cguz]ame
SFX E   ame   enmela      [^cguz]ame
SFX E   ame   enmelas     [^cguz]ame
SFX E   ame   enmele      [^cguz]ame
SFX E   ame   enmeles     [^cguz]ame
SFX E   ame   enselo      [^cguz]ame
SFX E   ame   enselos     [^cguz]ame
SFX E   ame   ensela      [^cguz]ame
SFX E   ame   enselas     [^cguz]ame
SFX E   ame   ensele      [^cguz]ame
SFX E   ame   enseles     [^cguz]ame
SFX E   ame   ennoslo     [^cguz]ame
SFX E   ame   ennoslos    [^cguz]ame
SFX E   ame   ennosla     [^cguz]ame
SFX E   ame   ennoslas    [^cguz]ame
SFX E   ame   ennosle     [^cguz]ame
SFX E   ame   ennosles    [^cguz]ame
SFX E   came  quemelo     came
SFX E   came  quemelos    came
SFX E   came  quemela     came
SFX E   came  quemelas    came
SFX E   came  quemele     came
SFX E   came  quemeles    came
SFX E   came  queselo     came
SFX E   came  queselos    came
SFX E   came  quesela     came
SFX E   came  queselas    came
SFX E   came  quesele     came
SFX E   came  queseles    came
SFX E   came  quenoslo    came
SFX E   came  quenoslos   came
SFX E   came  quenosla    came
SFX E   came  quenoslas   came
SFX E   came  quenosle    came
SFX E   came  quenosles   came
SFX E   came  quenmelo    came
SFX E   came  quenmelos   came
SFX E   came  quenmela    came
SFX E   came  quenmelas   came
SFX E   came  quenmele    came
SFX E   came  quenmeles   came
SFX E   came  quenselo    came
SFX E   came  quenselos   came
SFX E   came  quensela    came
SFX E   came  quenselas   came
SFX E   came  quensele    came
SFX E   came  quenseles   came
SFX E   came  quennoslo   came
SFX E   came  quennoslos  came
SFX E   came  quennosla   came
SFX E   came  quennoslas  came
SFX E   came  quennosle   came
SFX E   came  quennosles  came
SFX E   ame   uemelo      game
SFX E   ame   uemelos     game
SFX E   ame   uemela      game
SFX E   ame   uemelas     game
SFX E   ame   uemele      game
SFX E   ame   uemeles     game
SFX E   ame   ueselo      game
SFX E   ame   ueselos     game
SFX E   ame   uesela      game
SFX E   ame   ueselas     game
SFX E   ame   uesele      game
SFX E   ame   ueseles     game
SFX E   ame   uenoslo     game
SFX E   ame   uenoslos    game
SFX E   ame   uenosla     game
SFX E   ame   uenoslas    game
SFX E   ame   uenosle     game
SFX E   ame   uenosles    game
SFX E   ame   uenmelo     game
SFX E   ame   uenmelos    game
SFX E   ame   uenmela     game
SFX E   ame   uenmelas    game
SFX E   ame   uenmele     game
SFX E   ame   uenmeles    game
SFX E   ame   uenselo     game
SFX E   ame   uenselos    game
SFX E   ame   uensela     game
SFX E   ame   uenselas    game
SFX E   ame   uensele     game
SFX E   ame   uenseles    game
SFX E   ame   uennoslo    game
SFX E   ame   uennoslos   game
SFX E   ame   uennosla    game
SFX E   ame   uennoslas   game
SFX E   ame   uennosle    game
SFX E   ame   uennosles   game
SFX E   zame  cemelo      zame
SFX E   zame  cemelos     zame
SFX E   zame  cemela      zame
SFX E   zame  cemelas     zame
SFX E   zame  cemele      zame
SFX E   zame  cemeles     zame
SFX E   zame  ceselo      zame
SFX E   zame  ceselos     zame
SFX E   zame  cesela      zame
SFX E   zame  ceselas     zame
SFX E   zame  cesele      zame
SFX E   zame  ceseles     zame
SFX E   zame  cenoslo     zame
SFX E   zame  cenoslos    zame
SFX E   zame  cenosla     zame
SFX E   zame  cenoslas    zame
SFX E   zame  cenosle     zame
SFX E   zame  cenosles    zame
SFX E   zame  cenmelo     zame
SFX E   zame  cenmelos    zame
SFX E   zame  cenmela     zame
SFX E   zame  cenmelas    zame
SFX E   zame  cenmele     zame
SFX E   zame  cenmeles    zame
SFX E   zame  censelo     zame
SFX E   zame  censelos    zame
SFX E   zame  censela     zame
SFX E   zame  censelas    zame
SFX E   zame  censele     zame
SFX E   zame  censeles    zame
SFX E   zame  cennoslo    zame
SFX E   zame  cennoslos   zame
SFX E   zame  cennosla    zame
SFX E   zame  cennoslas   zame
SFX E   zame  cennosle    zame
SFX E   zame  cennosles   zame
SFX E   ame   emelo       [^g]uame
SFX E   ame   emelos      [^g]uame
SFX E   ame   emela       [^g]uame
SFX E   ame   emelas      [^g]uame
SFX E   ame   emele       [^g]uame
SFX E   ame   emeles      [^g]uame
SFX E   ame   eselo       [^g]uame
SFX E   ame   eselos      [^g]uame
SFX E   ame   esela       [^g]uame
SFX E   ame   eselas      [^g]uame
SFX E   ame   esele       [^g]uame
SFX E   ame   eseles      [^g]uame
SFX E   ame   enoslo      [^g]uame
SFX E   ame   enoslos     [^g]uame
SFX E   ame   enosla      [^g]uame
SFX E   ame   enoslas     [^g]uame
SFX E   ame   enosle      [^g]uame
SFX E   ame   enosles     [^g]uame
SFX E   ame   enmelo      [^g]uame
SFX E   ame   enmelos     [^g]uame
SFX E   ame   enmela      [^g]uame
SFX E   ame   enmelas     [^g]uame
SFX E   ame   enmele      [^g]uame
SFX E   ame   enmeles     [^g]uame
SFX E   ame   enselo      [^g]uame
SFX E   ame   enselos     [^g]uame
SFX E   ame   ensela      [^g]uame
SFX E   ame   enselas     [^g]uame
SFX E   ame   ensele      [^g]uame
SFX E   ame   enseles     [^g]uame
SFX E   ame   ennoslo     [^g]uame
SFX E   ame   ennoslos    [^g]uame
SFX E   ame   ennosla     [^g]uame
SFX E   ame   ennoslas    [^g]uame
SFX E   ame   ennosle     [^g]uame
SFX E   ame   ennosles    [^g]uame
SFX E   uame  üemelo      guame
SFX E   uame  üemelos     guame
SFX E   uame  üemela      guame
SFX E   uame  üemelas     guame
SFX E   uame  üemele      guame
SFX E   uame  üemeles     guame
SFX E   uame  üeselo      guame
SFX E   uame  üeselos     guame
SFX E   uame  üesela      guame
SFX E   uame  üeselas     guame
SFX E   uame  üesele      guame
SFX E   uame  üeseles     guame
SFX E   uame  üenoslo     guame
SFX E   uame  üenoslos    guame
SFX E   uame  üenosla     guame
SFX E   uame  üenoslas    guame
SFX E   uame  üenosle     guame
SFX E   uame  üenosles    guame
SFX E   uame  üenmelo     guame
SFX E   uame  üenmelos    guame
SFX E   uame  üenmela     guame
SFX E   uame  üenmelas    guame
SFX E   uame  üenmele     guame
SFX E   uame  üenmeles    guame
SFX E   uame  üenselo     guame
SFX E   uame  üenselos    guame
SFX E   uame  üensela     guame
SFX E   uame  üenselas    guame
SFX E   uame  üensele     guame
SFX E   uame  üenseles    guame
SFX E   uame  üennoslo    guame
SFX E   uame  üennoslos   guame
SFX E   uame  üennosla    guame
SFX E   uame  üennoslas   guame
SFX E   uame  üennosle    guame
SFX E   uame  üennosles   guame
SFX E   eme   amelo       [^cgu]eme
SFX E   eme   amelos      [^cgu]eme
SFX E   eme   amela       [^cgu]eme
SFX E   eme   amelas      [^cgu]eme
SFX E   eme   amele       [^cgu]eme
