windows/es.dic
échame/ACEF
úneme/ACEF
úsame/ACEF
abóname/ACEF
acéptame/ACEF
acógeme/ACEF
aciértame/ACEF
acreciéntame/ACEF
actúame/ACEF
adáptame/ACEF
adóbame/ACEF
adecúame/ACEF
adjúntame/ACEF
adminístrame/ACEF
afírmame/ACEF
agrégame/ACEF
ajústame/ACEF
alíviame/ACEF
almacéname/ACEF
amortíguame/ACEF
anótame/ACEF
anúlame/ACEF
antecógeme/ACEF
apáñame/ACEF
apártame/ACEF
apúntame/ACEF
apostíllame/ACEF
apréndeme/ACEF
arráncame/ACEF
arrebátame/ACEF
asóciame/ACEF
atraviésame/ACEF
auméntame/ACEF
bébeme/ACEF
búscame/ACEF
cállame/ACEF
cámbiame/ACEF
cárgame/ACEF
céntrame/ACEF
cógeme/ACEF
cómprame/ACEF
córtame/ACEF
calíbrame/ACEF
calcúlame/ACEF
cancélame/ACEF
catalógame/ACEF
ciérrame/ACEF
clávame/ACEF
codifícame/ACEF
colócame/ACEF
combíname/ACEF
compárame/ACEF
compútame/ACEF
complícame/ACEF
compruébame/ACEF
conéctame/ACEF
concaténame/ACEF
concrétame/ACEF
confeccióname/ACEF
consérvame/ACEF
consúltame/ACEF
consolídame/ACEF
constrúyeme/AE
contrólame/ACEF
convalídame/ACEF
corrígeme/ACEF
cuélgame/ACEF
cuídame/ACEF
débeme/ACEF
díctame/ACEF
dótame/ACEF
decodifícame/ACEF
defíneme/ACEF
demuéstrame/ACEF
desígname/ACEF
desagrúpame/ACEF
desarróllame/ACEF
descógeme/ACEF
descríbeme/ACEF
desencógeme/ACEF
desenciérrame/ACEF
desgárrame/ACEF
desinhíbeme/ACEF
despréciame/ACEF
destrúyeme/AE
detéctame/ACEF
dibújame/ACEF
dilúyeme/AE
diséñame/ACEF
distíngueme/ACEF
divídeme/ACEF
domíname/ACEF
edítame/ACEF
elévame/ACEF
elimíname/ACEF
empléame/ACEF
encógeme/ACEF
enciéndeme/ACEF
encuéntrame/ACEF
enfréntame/ACEF
engríeme/ACEF
enséñame/ACEF
entrégame/ACEF
entrelázame/ACEF
envíame/ACEF
escógeme/ACEF
espósame/ACEF
espúrreme/ACEF
especifícame/ACEF
esquéjame/ACEF
esquífame/ACEF
esquílmame/ACEF
esquínzame/ACEF
esquebrájame/ACEF
estáfame/ACEF
estámpame/ACEF
estézame/ACEF
estímame/ACEF
estórbame/ACEF
estózame/ACEF
estúfame/ACEF
estúrame/ACEF
estabúlame/ACEF
establéame/ACEF
estampíllame/ACEF
esterílizame/ACEF
estereotípame/ACEF
estimúlame/ACEF
estipúlame/ACEF
estirájame/ACEF
estoquéame/ACEF
estozólame/ACEF
estréllame/ACEF
estríame/ACEF
estrújame/ACEF
estratifícame/ACEF
estropéame/ACEF
eternízame/ACEF
evácuame/ACEF
evítame/ACEF
evalúame/ACEF
evapórame/ACEF
evidénciame/ACEF
exáltame/ACEF
exígeme/ACEF
exórame/ACEF
exagérame/ACEF
excávame/ACEF
excítame/ACEF
excúlpame/ACEF
excepcióname/ACEF
excláustrame/ACEF
exhálame/ACEF
exhórtame/ACEF
expándeme/ACEF
expídeme/ACEF
expúgname/ACEF
expansióname/ACEF
expláyame/ACEF
explórame/ACEF
exprópiame/ACEF
extírpame/ACEF
exteriorízame/ACEF
extráñame/ACEF
extravásame/ACEF
fájame/ACEF
félpame/ACEF
fíchame/ACEF
fílame/ACEF
fíltrame/ACEF
físgame/ACEF
fórjame/ACEF
fórrame/ACEF
fúndame/ACEF
fabúlame/ACEF
facúltame/ACEF
factúrame/ACEF
falséame/ACEF
fatígame/ACEF
fecundízame/ACEF
felicítame/ACEF
fertilízame/ACEF
figúrame/ACEF
finánciame/ACEF
fiscalízame/ACEF
flétame/ACEF
foguéame/ACEF
fondéame/ACEF
formalízame/ACEF
fortifícame/ACEF
fotografíame/ACEF
frésame/ACEF
frústrame/ACEF
fractúrame/ACEF
fraséame/ACEF
friégame/ACEF
fuéllame/ACEF
fulmíname/ACEF
fundaméntame/ACEF
gáfame/ACEF
gástame/ACEF
galvanízame/ACEF
garantízame/ACEF
gasifícame/ACEF
generalízame/ACEF
gesticúlame/ACEF
glaséame/ACEF
golpéame/ACEF
granúlame/ACEF
identifícame/ACEF
imagíname/ACEF
implémentame/ACEF
iníciame/ACEF
incorpórame/ACEF
indícame/ACEF
inmiscúyeme/AE
inocúlame/ACEF
inscríbeme/ACEF
instálame/ACEF
instrúyeme/AE
intercálame/ACEF
intercéptame/ACEF
interrúmpeme/ACEF
justifícame/ACEF
límpiame/ACEF
lléname/ACEF
mátame/ACEF
mímame/ACEF
mastúrbame/ACEF
minimízame/ACEF
muéveme/AE
niégame/ACEF
ocúpame/ACEF
ordéname/ACEF
párame/ACEF
pídeme/ACEF
persígueme/ACEF
plantéame/ACEF
prepárame/ACEF
prohíbeme/ACEF
prostitúyeme/AE
puntúame/ACEF
réstame/ACEF
reúneme/ACEF
rebájame/ACEF
recárgame/ACEF
recórtame/ACEF
recomiéndame/ACEF
recupérame/ACEF
reelígeme/ACEF
refíname/ACEF
regístrame/ACEF
reinstálame/ACEF
relléname/ACEF
repárteme/ACEF
resérvame/ACEF
resuélveme/AE
reutilízame/ACEF
sálvame/ACEF
sacúdeme/ACEF
simplifícame/ACEF
solucióname/ACEF
subráyame/ACEF
suscríbeme/ACEF
tómame/ACEF
transfiéreme/ACEF
véndame/ACEF
vuélveme/AE
